Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7913
Incident report or risk management report; how treated; burden of proof.

(1) An incident report or risk management report and the contents of an incident report or risk management report are not subject to discovery in, and are not admissible in evidence in the trial of, a civil action for damages for injury, death, or loss to a patient of a health care provider. A person who prepares or has knowledge of the contents of an incident report or risk management report shall not testify and shall not be required to testify in any civil action as to the contents of the report.

(2) A health care provider or individual claiming the privileges under this section has the burden of proving that the communications and documents are protected.

Laws 2011, LB431, § 10;

Laws 2019, LB119, § 8.